Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2424.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-828, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-828. Proxies A. A political party may choose, through its bylaws, to allow the use of proxies at its meetings, in which event the following shall be minimum regulations: 1. No proxy shall be given by a member of the state committee for use at a meeting of the committee except to a qualified elector of the county where the member resides. 2. No proxy shall be given by a member of the county committee for use at a meeting of the committee except to a qualified elector of the precinct where the member resides. 3. In a precinct with two or fewer precinct committeemen, a precinct committeeman may appoint a qualified elector from a geographically adjoining precinct to vote by proxy on behalf of the precinct committeeman in a county committee meeting. B. The duration of any proxy so given shall extend only for the length of the meeting for which it is given. C. Every proxy shall be attested by a notary public or two witnesses. END_STATUTE